Utah statutes.
59-1-305.   Convenience fee to cover the costs of electronic payments.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Electronic payment" has the same meaning as defined in Section
41-1a-1221.
(b)  "Electronic payment fee" has the same meaning as defined in Section
41-1a-1221.
(2)  The commission may collect a convenience electronic payment fee
established in accordance with the procedures and requirements of Section
63J-1-504 to cover the costs of electronic payments of taxes and fees
administered by the commission.
(3)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, the commission shall
use a fee imposed under this section as a dedicated credit to cover the costs
of electronic payments.
